Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Chapter 11. Justices of the Peace

§ 491.
Qualification of justice of the peace—Filing of oath and certificate.

Before entering upon his or her duties, each justice shall deposit with the town clerk a copy of his or her official oath, signed by himself or herself, with a certificate of the magistrate or notary public administering the same.
The Secretary of State shall provide oath forms for this purpose. The term of office of justices of the peace shall be two years, and shall commence on the first day of February next after their election.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 71

;

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1983, No. 26

, eff. April 11, 1983.

§ 492.
Penalty.

When a justice willfully neglects to make such deposit with the town clerk, he or she may be fined not more than $100.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 493.
Repealed.
1981, No. 239 (Adj. Sess.), § 45.

§§ 494-499.
Repealed. 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 500.
Expiration of term of office; certified copies of records.

After the expiration of his or her term of office and while residing in the same county, a justice may make and certify copies of the records of his or her official business.
Such copies shall have the same validity as though made and certified while he or she was in office.

§§ 501-504.
Repealed.
1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 505.
Repealed.
1971, No. 258 (Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§§ 506-508.
Repealed.
1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.